Utah statutes.
48-2c-1209.   Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the division denies a company's application for reinstatement under Section 48-2c-1208 following administrative dissolution, the division shall mail to the company in the manner provided in Subsection 48-2c-1207(5) written notice:

(1)  setting forth the reasons for denying the application; and

(2)  stating that the company has the right to appeal the division's determination to the executive director of the Department of Commerce in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.



Amended by Chapter 141, 2009 General Session

